Indiana, session 2026, HB1149.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 6-3.1-31.6 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JANUARY 1, 2027]:
Chapter 31.6. Early Childhood Scholarship Tax Credit
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "credit" refers to a credit
granted under this chapter.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "early childhood scholarship"
refers to a grant to pay only the cost of attendance for a qualified
child at a qualified early child care provider for which the
scholarship will be granted.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "early childhood scholarship
granting organization" refers to an organization that:
(1) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) conducts an early childhood scholarship program.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "early childhood scholarship
program" refers to a program conducted by an early childhood
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


scholarship granting organization to provide early childhood
scholarships to qualified children in which not more than twenty
five percent (25%) of the early childhood scholarship granting
organization's total contributions for the program in a taxable year
are used to provide early childhood scholarships to attend a
particular qualified early child care provider.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "pass through entity" has the
meaning set forth in IC 6-3-1-35.
Sec. 6. As used in this chapter, "qualified child" means a child
that is not more than six (6) years of age.
Sec. 7. As used in this chapter, "qualified early child care
provider" refers to a child care provider that:
(1) is:
(A) a licensed child care center under IC 12-17.2-4;
(B) a licensed child care home under IC 12-17.2-5; or
(C) a licensed child care ministry under IC 12-17.2-6;
that meets the standards of quality recognized by a Level 3 or
Level 4 Paths to QUALITY program rating under
IC 12-17.2-2-14.2 or has a comparable rating from a
nationally recognized accrediting body;
(2) is a state accredited school as described in IC 20-18-2-18.8;
(3) is a state accredited nonpublic school as described in
IC 20-18-2-18.7; or
(4) is a school that is accredited by or obtains provisional
accreditation from a national or regional accreditation agency
that is recognized by the state board.
Sec. 8. As used in this chapter, "state tax liability" means a
taxpayer's total tax liability that is incurred under:
(1) IC 6-3-1 through IC 6-3-7 (the adjusted gross income tax);
(2) IC 6-5.5 (the financial institutions tax); and
(3) IC 27-1-18-2 (the insurance premiums tax) or IC 6-8-15
(the nonprofit agricultural organization health coverage tax);
as computed after the application of the credits that under
IC 6-3.1-1-2 are to be applied before the credit provided by this
chapter.
Sec. 9. As used in this chapter, "taxpayer" means an individual
or entity that has any state tax liability.
Sec. 10. A taxpayer that makes a contribution to an early
childhood scholarship granting organization for use by the early
childhood scholarship granting organization for an early childhood
scholarship program is entitled to a credit against the taxpayer's
state tax liability in the taxable year in which the taxpayer makes
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


the contribution.
Sec. 11. The amount of a taxpayer's credit is equal to fifty
percent (50%) of the amount of the contribution made to the early
childhood scholarship granting organization for an early childhood
scholarship program.
Sec. 12. (a) If the credit provided by this chapter exceeds the
taxpayer's state tax liability for the taxable year for which the
credit is first claimed, the excess may be carried forward to
succeeding taxable years and used as a credit against the
taxpayer's state tax liability during those taxable years. Each time
the credit is carried forward to a succeeding taxable year, the
credit is reduced by the amount that was used as a credit during
the immediately preceding taxable year. The credit provided by
this chapter may be carried forward and applied to succeeding
taxable years for nine (9) taxable years following the unused credit
year.
(b) A taxpayer is not entitled to a carryback or refund of any
unused credit.
Sec. 13. If a pass through entity is entitled to a credit under
section 10 of this chapter but does not have state tax liability
against which the tax credit may be applied, a shareholder,
partner, or member of the pass through entity is entitled to a tax
credit equal to:
(1) the tax credit determined for the pass through entity for
the taxable year; multiplied by
(2) the percentage of the pass through entity's distributive
income to which the shareholder, partner, or member is
entitled.
Sec. 14. To apply a credit against the taxpayer's state tax
liability, a taxpayer must claim the credit on the taxpayer's annual
state tax return or returns in the manner prescribed by the
department. The taxpayer shall submit to the department the
information that the department determines is necessary for the
department to determine whether the taxpayer is eligible for the
credit.
Sec. 15. A contribution to an early childhood scholarship
granting organization shall be treated as having been made for use
in an early childhood scholarship program if:
(1) the contribution is made directly to an early childhood
scholarship granting organization; and
(2) either:
(A) not later than the date of the contribution, the taxpayer
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


designates in writing to the early childhood scholarship
granting organization that the contribution is to be used
only for an early childhood scholarship program; or
(B) the early childhood scholarship granting organization
provides the taxpayer with written confirmation that the
contribution will be dedicated solely for use in an early
childhood scholarship program.
Sec. 16. The total amount of tax credits awarded under this
chapter in a state fiscal year may not exceed one hundred million
dollars ($100,000,000).
Sec. 17. The department, on a website used by the department
to provide information to the public, shall provide the following
information:
(1) The application for the credit provided in this chapter.
(2) A timeline for receiving the credit provided in this chapter.
(3) The total amount of credits awarded under this chapter
during the current state fiscal year.
Sec. 18. The department shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
SECTION 2. IC 20-20-28-5.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5.5. A school corporation that
operates an early childhood education program may not limit
consideration for participation in the program solely to those
residing within the school district.
SECTION 3. IC 20-51-1-4.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.1. "Early childhood scholarship" refers to a grant
to pay only the cost of child care tuition or expenses for a qualified
child as determined for the fiscal year for which the scholarship
will be granted.
SECTION 4. IC 20-51-1-4.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 4.2. "Early childhood scholarship granting
organization" refers to an organization that:
(1) is exempt from federal income taxation under Section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code; and
(2) is organized at least in part to grant early childhood
education scholarships without limiting the availability of
early childhood scholarships to students of only one (1)
qualified early child care provider.
SECTION 5. IC 20-51-1-6.2 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.2. "Qualified child" refers to a child who:
(1) resides in Indiana; and
(2) is not more than six (6) years of age.
SECTION 6. IC 20-51-1-6.4 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 6.4. "Qualified early child care provider" refers to a
child care provider that:
(1) is:
(A) a licensed child care center under IC 12-17.2-4;
(B) a licensed child care home under IC 12-17.2-5; or
(C) a licensed child care ministry under IC 12-17.2-6;
that meets the standards of quality recognized by a Level 3 or
Level 4 Paths to QUALITY program rating under
IC 12-17.2-2-14.2 or has a comparable rating from a
nationally recognized accrediting body;
(2) is a state accredited school as described in IC 20-18-2-18.8;
(3) is a state accredited nonpublic school as described in
IC 20-18-2-18.7; or
(4) is a school that is accredited by or obtains provisional
accreditation from a national or regional accreditation agency
that is recognized by the state board.
SECTION 7. IC 20-51-5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE AS
A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]:
Chapter 5. Early Childhood Scholarship Granting
Organizations; Certification; Administration of Contributions
Sec. 1. A program qualifies for certification as an early
childhood scholarship program if:
(1) the program:
(A) is administered by an early childhood scholarship
granting organization; and
(B) has the primary purpose of providing early childhood
scholarships to qualified children; and
(2) the early childhood scholarship granting organization
administering the program:
(A) applies to the department on the form and in the
manner prescribed by the department; and
(B) enters into an agreement with the department to
comply with this article.
Sec. 2. The department shall certify all programs that meet the
qualifications under section 1 of this chapter as school scholarship
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


programs.
Sec. 3. An agreement entered into under section 1 of this chapter
between the department and an early childhood scholarship
granting organization must require the early childhood scholarship
granting organization to do the following:
(1) Provide a receipt to taxpayers for contributions made to
the early childhood scholarship granting organization that
will be used in an early childhood scholarship program. The
department of state revenue shall prescribe a standardized
form for the receipt issued under this subdivision. The receipt
must indicate the value of the contribution and the part of the
contribution being designated for use in an early childhood
scholarship program.
(2) Allow a taxpayer to designate a qualified early child care
provider for which the taxpayer's contribution must be used
as scholarships.
(3) Use not more than ten percent (10%) of the total amount
of contributions for administrative costs.
(4) Distribute one hundred percent (100%) of any income
earned on contributions as early childhood scholarships to
qualified children.
(5) Conduct criminal background checks on all the early
childhood scholarship granting organization's employees and
board members and exclude from employment or governance
any individual who might reasonably pose a risk to the
appropriate use of contributed funds.
(6) Make the reports required by this chapter.
Sec. 4. An agreement entered into under section 1 of this chapter
may not prohibit an early childhood scholarship granting
organization from receiving contributions other than contributions
described in section 3(1) of this chapter.
Sec. 5. (a) An agreement entered into under section 1 of this
chapter must prohibit an early childhood scholarship granting
organization from distributing scholarships for use by a qualified
child to:
(1) enroll in a qualified early child care provider that has:
(A) paid staff or board members; or
(B) relatives of paid staff or board members;
in common with the early childhood scholarship granting
organization;
(2) enroll in a qualified early child care provider that the
early childhood scholarship granting organization knows does
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


not qualify as a qualified early child care provider; or
(3) pay for the cost of child care for a qualified early child
care provider where the qualified child is entitled to enroll
without the payment of tuition.
(b) An agreement entered into under section 1 of this chapter
must prohibit an early childhood scholarship granting organization
from limiting the availability of scholarships to children of only one
(1) qualified early child care provider. An agreement entered into
under section 1 of this chapter before July 1, 2026, must be
amended to include the requirement specified in this subsection.
Sec. 6. (a) An early childhood scholarship granting organization
certified under this chapter must publicly report to the department
by December 1 of each year the following information regarding
the organization's scholarships awarded in the previous school
year:
(1) The name and address of the early childhood scholarship
granting organization.
(2) The total number and total dollar amount of contributions
received during the previous fiscal year.
(3) The:
(A) total number and total dollar amount of all
scholarships awarded during the previous fiscal year; and
(B) total number and total dollar amount of early
childhood scholarships awarded during the previous fiscal
year.
The report must be certified under penalties of perjury by the chief
executive officer of the early childhood scholarship granting
organization.
(b) An early childhood scholarship granting organization
certified under this chapter shall contract with an independent
certified public accountant for an annual financial audit of the
early childhood scholarship granting organization. The early
childhood scholarship granting organization must provide a copy
of the annual financial audit to the department and must make the
annual financial audit available to a member of the public upon
request.
Sec. 7. The department shall prescribe a standardized form for
early childhood scholarship granting organizations to report
information required under this chapter.
Sec. 8. The department may, in a proceeding under IC 4-21.5,
suspend or terminate the certification of an organization as an
early childhood scholarship granting organization if the
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120


department establishes that the early childhood scholarship
granting organization:
(1) has intentionally and substantially failed to comply with
the requirements of this chapter or an agreement entered into
under this chapter; or
(2) has not granted an early childhood scholarship, as defined
in IC 20-51-1-4.1, for either:
(A) three (3) consecutive years; or
(B) within the first two (2) years of operation as a certified
early childhood scholarship granting organization.
Sec. 9. If the department suspends or terminates the
certification of an organization as an early childhood scholarship
granting organization, the department shall notify all affected
eligible students and their parents of the decision as quickly as
possible. An eligible student affected by a suspension or
termination of an early childhood scholarship granting
organization's certification remains an eligible student under this
chapter until the end of the school year after the school year in
which the early childhood scholarship granting organization's
certification is suspended or terminated, regardless of whether the
scholarship student currently meets the definition of an eligible
student.
Sec. 10. The department may conduct either a financial review
or an audit of an early childhood scholarship granting organization
certified under this chapter if the department of state revenue has
evidence of fraud.
Sec. 11. The department may adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this chapter.
2026 IN 1149—LS 6698/DI 120